Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 2. Toll Bridge Revenue Bonds.

Sec. 37.15.225.
Bond authorization.

For purposes of financing a portion of the costs of the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities or other toll bridges as the legislature may designate, including the costs of bond issuance, the issuance and sale of bonds of the state by the committee is authorized as provided in AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

. The net proceeds of the sale of the bonds remaining after payment of costs of issuance, capitalized interest, if any, and making deposits to the bond reserve fund under AS

37.15.260

, shall be transferred to the Knik Arm construction fund established in AS

37.15.230

or may be held by a trustee to be disbursed to pay the costs of a toll bridge under the terms and conditions set out in a trust agreement. Accrued interest paid on the bonds shall be paid into the bond redemption fund.

Prior to the issuance of bonds authorized under (a) of this section, the committee shall send notice of the issuance to the legislature.

The total unpaid principal amount of bonds, including refunding bonds, but excluding refunded bonds, is limited as provided in AS

37.15.235

. The bonds do not constitute a general obligation of the state. Authorization by the voters of the state or the legislature is not required.

The committee may enter into agreements with other state agencies as necessary or convenient to implement AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

.

The committee may contract for the services of underwriters, paying agents, trustees, bond printers, rating agencies, bond insurance, credit enhancement providers, accountants, financial advisors, and bond counsel, and other services as are necessary to accomplish the bond issuance and sale.

The state may not issue bonds under (a) of this section for financing the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities until the Federal Highway Administration, United States Department of Transportation, has approved a loan to the state of at least 30 percent of the total project cost for construction of the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities under 23 U.S.C. 601 — 609 (Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 1998).

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.230.
Knik Arm construction fund.

The Knik Arm construction fund is established in the general fund to receive the proceeds of the sale of bonds issued under AS

37.15.225

, and other state or federal money that is appropriated for the same purpose for which the bonds are issued. The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall use money in the construction fund to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, and equipping the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities. To the extent allowed by the bond resolution, money in the construction fund may also be used for the payment of interest on the bonds during the time of construction. Money in the construction fund may be transferred to the bond redemption fund, as permitted by the bond resolution.

The bond resolution may provide for the investment of money in the construction fund as the committee determines. The interest earned on the investment of money in the fund shall be retained in the fund.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.235.
Toll bridge revenue bond limit.

The total unpaid principal amount of revenue bonds issued under AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

, including refunding bonds but excluding refunded bonds, may not exceed $300,000,000.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.240.
Toll bridge revenue fund.

The toll bridge revenue fund is established as a separate fund of the state. The revenue fund consists of all revenue, fees, charges, and rentals received by the state, by contract with the authority or otherwise, from the ownership or operation of toll bridges and facilities and improvements used in connection with the toll bridges and facilities. Contracts or other agreements with the authority may establish priorities for the payment of operation and maintenance costs of the authority. The money in the revenue fund may be used only

to pay or secure payment of the principal of and interest on bonds;

to redeem bonds before their fixed maturities;

to pay indebtedness to the Federal Highway Administration, United States Department of Transportation; and

subject to appropriation by the legislature, for any other purpose for which federal funds may be obligated by the state under 23 U.S.C. 129(a).

The investment of money in the revenue fund may be made in the manner that the committee or the committee’s delegated representative may determine. The interest earned on or any profits derived from the sale of this investment shall be deposited in and become a part of the revenue fund.

All references to the toll bridge revenue fund in this section include special accounts within the toll bridge revenue fund that may be created by resolution or trust agreement to secure the payment of particular bonds.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.245.
Toll bridge revenue bond redemption fund.

The toll bridge revenue bond redemption fund is established as a special fund of the state. The bond redemption fund is a trust fund for paying and securing the payment of the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds and shall be at all times completely segregated and set apart from all other funds of the state. The bond redemption fund shall be drawn on only for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds, together with related trustee fees, if any.

Money in the bond redemption fund may be invested in the same manner and on the same conditions as permitted for investment of money belonging to the state or held in the treasury under AS

37.10.070

; however, the committee may agree with the bondholders to further limit these investments. Earnings on investments must be retained in the bond redemption fund or a designated account in the bond redemption fund.

All references to the bond redemption fund in this section include special accounts in the bond redemption fund that may be created by resolution or first agreement to secure the payment of particular bonds.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.250.
Bond terms.

The bonds may be issued and sold at public or negotiated sale in the manner, in the amounts or series, and at the time or times that the committee or the committee’s delegated representative determines. The bonds, or each series of them, shall be sold at the price and on the terms, conditions, and covenants set by the committee or the committee’s delegated representative after considering market conditions. Interest rates may be fixed or variable.

The bonds mature at the time or times fixed by the committee or the committee’s delegated representative. The bonds may be subject to redemption before their fixed maturities, as determined by the committee or the committee’s delegated representative, with or without a premium or premiums. The bonds may be in denominations determined by the committee or the committee’s delegated representative; may be issued in fully or partially registered form; must be payable as to principal and interest at the place or places determined by the committee; must be signed on behalf of the state in the manner provided by the committee; and must be issued under and subject to the terms, conditions, covenants, and protective features safeguarding payment of the bonds and relating to the funding of projects as found necessary by the committee or the committee’s delegated representative.

If the committee or the committee’s delegated representative finds it reasonably necessary, the committee or the committee’s delegated representative may select a trustee or trustees for the holders of the bonds, or any series of them, for the safeguarding and disbursement of any of the money in the bond redemption fund, or for duties with respect to the enforcement, authentication, delivery, payment, and registration of the bonds as the committee may determine. The committee or the committee’s delegated representative shall fix the rights, duties, powers, and obligations of the trustee or trustees.

In its determination of all matters and questions relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds and the fixing of their maturities, terms, conditions, and covenants as provided in (a) — (c) of this section, the decisions of the committee shall be reasonably necessary for the best interests of the state and accomplish the most advantageous sale of the bonds. Decisions of the committee, as expressed in a bond resolution, are final and conclusively considered to comply with the requirements of AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.255.
Bond resolution.

The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds by adopting a resolution and shall prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds or any part or series of them. The bond resolution may fix or the committee’s delegated representative, subject to parameters set by the committee, may fix the principal amount, denominations, date, maturities, manner of sale, place or places of payment, rights of redemption, if any, terms, form, conditions, and covenants of the bonds or each series of bonds.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.260.
Bond reserve fund.

The resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds under AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

may provide for the establishment and maintenance of a special fund called the toll bridge revenue bond reserve fund in which there shall be deposited or transferred

all money appropriated by the legislature for the purpose of the fund including appropriations in accordance with (g) of this section; and

all proceeds of bonds required to be deposited in the fund by terms of the bond resolution or a trust agreement with respect to the proceeds of bonds.

Subject to (h) of this section, money in the reserve fund shall be held and applied solely to the payment of the interest on and principal of bonds authorized under AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

as the interest and principal become due and payable to the retirement of bonds. Money may not be withdrawn if a withdrawal would reduce the amount in the reserve fund to an amount less than the required debt service reserve except for payment of interest then due and payable on bonds and the principal of bonds then maturing and payable and for the retirement of bonds in accordance with the terms of the bond resolution or trust agreement and for which payment is not then available.

Money in the reserve fund in excess of the required debt service reserve as defined in (b) of this section, whether because of investment or otherwise, may be withdrawn at any time or may be transferred to the bond redemption fund subject to (h) of this section.

Money in the reserve fund may be invested in the same manner and on the same conditions as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the state or held in the treasury under AS

37.10.070

; however, the committee or the committee’s delegated representative may agree with the bondholders to further limit these investments.

For purposes of valuation, investments in the reserve fund shall be valued at par or, if purchased at less than par, at cost, unless otherwise provided by resolution of the committee. Valuation on a particular date shall include the amount of interest then earned or accrued to that date on the money or investments in the reserve fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

, bonds may not be issued under a trust agreement, indenture, or bond resolution unless there is in the reserve fund the required debt service reserve for all bonds then issued under a trust agreement, indenture, or bond resolution and outstanding and for the bonds to be issued; however, the committee may satisfy this requirement by depositing as much of the proceeds of the bonds to be issued, on their issuance, as is needed to meet the required debt service reserve. The committee may, at any time, issue bonds or notes for the purpose of increasing the amount in the reserve fund to the required debt service reserve, or to meet whatever higher or additional reserve that may be fixed by a bond resolution or trust agreement with respect to the fund.

To ensure the required debt service reserve is maintained in the reserve fund, the legislature may appropriate annually for deposit in the fund the sum, certified by the commissioner of revenue to the governor and to the legislature, that is necessary to restore the fund to an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The commissioner of revenue annually, before January 30, shall make and deliver to the governor and to the legislature a certificate stating the sum required to restore the fund to that amount, and the certified sum may be appropriated during the then current state fiscal year. Nothing in this subsection creates a debt or liability of the state.

All amounts received because of money appropriated to the reserve fund shall be held and applied in accordance with (b) of this section.

All references to the reserve fund in this section include special accounts within the reserve fund that may be created by resolution or trust agreement to secure the payment of particular bonds.

The commissioner of revenue may, subject to appropriation, lend surplus money in the general fund for deposit to an account in the reserve fund in an amount equal to the required debt service reserve. The loans shall be made on the terms and conditions that may be agreed on by the commissioner of revenue and the trustee, including, without limitation, terms and conditions providing that the loans need not be repaid until the obligations of the state secured and to be secured by the account in the reserve fund are no longer outstanding.

In this section, “required debt service reserve” means, on the date of computation, the amount required to be on deposit in the reserve fund as provided by resolution of the committee.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.265.
Enforcement by bond owner.

The holder of any bonds or the trustee for the holders of the bonds or any series of them, may, by appropriate proceedings in the superior court, compel the transfer, setting aside, and payment of money and the enforcement of all of the terms, conditions, and covenants as required and provided for in AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

and in the bond resolution or trust agreement.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.270.
Amounts required for payments.

The committee shall, before June 30 of each year or from time to time within the year, as appropriate, commencing with the year in which the bonds are issued, certify to the commissioners of revenue and administration the amounts required in the current fiscal year and the next ensuing fiscal year by the bond resolution or resolutions or trust agreements to be paid out of toll bridge revenue or capitalized amounts into the bond redemption fund and to be paid into and maintained in any reserve fund or account or other fund or account created by the bond resolution or resolutions. The committee shall also certify to the commissioners the last date or dates on which payments may be made.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.275.
Refunding.

The committee may refund the bonds or any part of the bonds at or before their maturity or redemption dates by issuing refunding revenue bonds of the state if the committee determines the refunding to be advantageous to and in the best interest of the state.

The issuance of refunding bonds need not be authorized by the voters of the state or by an act of the legislature. The committee shall adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, exchange or sale, and delivery of the refunding bonds. All provisions of AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

applicable to revenue bonds are applicable to the refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange of the refunding bonds, except as otherwise provided in this section.

The committee may issue refunding bonds in a principal amount sufficient to provide money for the advance or current refunding of all bonds to be refunded and interest on the refunded bonds and to pay the costs of issuance and administration of the refunding bonds. These expenses also include the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the refunding bonds are sold; the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing on them to the date of the call or retirement; and other costs. The committee is authorized to incur the expenses.

The committee or the committee’s delegated representative may contract with a refunding trustee to hold the proceeds of refunding bonds in trust until the proceeds, together with earnings on the proceeds, are applied to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds to be refunded. Until the refunding bond proceeds are applied, the proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States or an agency or corporation of the United States whose obligations constitute direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.280.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds are legal investments for all banks, trust companies, savings banks, savings and loan associations, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. The bonds may be accepted as security for deposits of all money of the state and its political subdivisions.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.285.
Statutory construction.

AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

shall be liberally construed in order to carry out the purposes for which they were enacted.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.15.290.
Definitions.

In AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

,

“authority” means

the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority established in AS

19.75.021

with respect to the Knik Arm bridge and its appurtenant facilities; or

an authority established by the legislature for any other toll bridge project;

“bond redemption fund” means the toll bridge revenue bond redemption fund established in AS

37.15.245

;

“bond resolution” means a resolution adopted by the committee under AS

37.15.255

to authorize the issuance of bonds;

“bonds” means the toll bridge revenue bonds authorized in AS

37.15.225

—

37.15.290

;

“committee” means the state bond committee created in AS

37.15.110

, or any other committee, body, department, or officer of the state that succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the state bond committee by law;

“costs of issuance and administration” means all costs associated with issuance and administration of toll bridge revenue bonds and refunding bonds, including costs of bond printing, official statements, financial advisors, travel costs, rating agencies, bond insurance, letters and lines of credit for credit enhancement, underwriters, legal services, paying agents, bond registrars, bond and escrow trustees, arbitrage rebate, and all other costs, including administrative costs, both direct and indirect;

“reserve fund” means the toll bridge revenue bond reserve fund authorized in AS

37.15.260

;

“revenue fund” means the toll bridge revenue fund established in AS

37.15.240

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 51 SLA 2014)